Washington statutes.
RCW 11.64.008

Surviving partner may continue in possession.

The surviving partner or partners may continue in possession of the partnership estate, pay its debts, and settle its business, and shall account to the personal representative of the decedent and shall pay over such balances as may, from time to time, be payable to him or her.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2054; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 14; 1965 c 145 s 11.64.008. Prior: 1951 c 197 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.